Hawaii, session 2026, SB178.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that surfing is of significant cultural, social, and economic value to the people of Hawaii, as well as the many visitors who travel to the State for surfing.  In recognition of surfing as a part of the State's history and for the sport's long-standing historical and cultural roots in Hawaii, surfing was sanctioned by the department of education and approved by the board of education as a high school sport in 2016.  However, only one of five local athletic leagues have sponsored surfing.  The lack of interscholastic surfing programs limits opportunities for inspired students to pursue competitive surfing. The legislature further finds that surfing is a significant economic driver for the State.  In Hawaii, the birthplace of modern surfing, surfing has grown into an important industry, bringing in tourists from all over the world.  Hawaii is also known for hosting prestigious surf contests that attract numerous competitors and spectators interested in viewing the sport in person.  An economic impact study on the 2010 Vans Triple Crown of Surfing, held on the north shore of Oahu, estimated that the event generated $20,900,000 in spending. Devoting resources to surfing programs in Hawaii's schools will perpetuate the sport of surfing in the State and continue to entice tourists across the globe to visit Hawaii and spectate or experience surfing firsthand. The purpose of this Act is to appropriate funds to the department of education to support the establishment of surfing as an interscholastic sport. SECTION 2.  There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $2,000,000 or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2025-2026 and the same sum or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 to support the establishment of surfing as an interscholastic sport. The sums appropriated shall be expended by the department of education for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 3.  This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2025. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________